Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.820

Code city retaining former second-class city plan—Health officer.

In a city initially classified as a second-class city prior to January 1, 1993, that retained its second-class city plan of government when the city reorganized as a noncharter code city, the council shall create the office of city health officer, prescribe the duties and qualifications of this office and fix the compensation for the office.

[ 1994 c 81 s 28; 1965 c 7 s 35.23.150. Prior: 1907 c 241 s 64; RRS s 9067. Formerly RCW 35.23.150.]